North Carolina, session 2025, HB93.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 4 of Article VI of the North Carolina Constitution is repealed.
SECTION 2. The amendment set out in Section 1 of this act shall be submitted to
the qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held on November 3, 2026,
which election shall be conducted under the laws then governing elections in the State. Ballots,
voting systems, or both may be used in accordance with Chapter 163 of the General Statutes. The
question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment to remove the literacy test requirement for voting from the
North Carolina Constitution. The federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 prohibits implementation of
this requirement."
SECTION 3. The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the referendum
conducted under Section 2 of this act. If a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of
the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act, the Secretary of State shall enroll the amendment
among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of votes cast on the question are against
the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act, the amendment shall have no effect.
SECTION 4. If the certification from the State Board of Elections under Section 3
of this act reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of the amendment set
out in Section 1 of this act, the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act is effective upon
certification.
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
*H93-v-1*